Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska46-1230
Licensees; proof of insurance.

Each applicant for an initial license as a licensed water well contractor or as a licensed pump installation contractor shall furnish proof to the department that there is in force a policy of public liability and property damage insurance issued to the applicant in an amount established by the department by rules and regulations sufficient to protect the public interest. Proof of insurance shall be maintained and submitted annually for the term of the active license.

Laws 1986, LB 310, § 30;

Laws 2007, LB463, § 1165.